Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.650

Gifts and bequests relating to mining.

The department may receive on behalf of the state, for the benefit of mining and mineral development, gifts, bequests, devises, and legacies of real or personal property and use them in accordance with the wishes of the donors and manage, use, and dispose of them for the best interests of mining and mineral development.

[ 2003 c 334 s 110; 1988 c 127 s 5; 1965 c 8 s 43.21.080. Prior: 1935 c 142 s 3; RRS s 8614-3. Formerly RCW 43.30.141, 43.21.080.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.